Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 18 Probation

12-18-1.
Placement of offenders under director of corrections.

It shall be lawful for any court in the state, at any time before sentence, to provisionally place any offender, juvenile or adult, who can lawfully be admitted to bail, under the control and supervision of the director of corrections or the director’s designee or any probation officer that the director may designate, and whenever any offender shall be placed in the custody or under the control and supervision of the director or designee or of any designated probation officer, the director or designee and the probation officer shall have and exercise the same rights and powers in relation to the offender as are or may be possessed by a surety on a recognizance.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 405, § 2; P.L. 1926, ch. 861, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 405, § 3; P.L. 1932, ch. 1930, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 619, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-18-1

; P.L. 1966, ch. 182, § 2; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1972, ch. 163, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 6.

12-18-2.
Return of probationers or parolees from outside state.

Whenever any person who has been placed in custody of the director of corrections or the director’s designee or of a probation officer by any court in this state, or has been paroled by the parole board, has left this state while in custody or while on parole, the director or designee, in his or her discretion, with the advice of the attorney general, is authorized to cause the person to be brought back to this state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 352, § 5; P.L. 1912, ch. 777, § 1; P.L. 1914, ch. 1052, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 405, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 405, § 3; P.L. 1926, ch. 861, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 405, § 4; P.L. 1932, ch. 1930, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 619, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-18-2

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1972, ch. 163, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 6.

12-18-3.
Plea of nolo contendere followed by probation — Effect.

Whenever any person shall be arraigned before the district court or superior court and shall plead nolo contendere, and the court places the person on probation pursuant to §

12-18-1

, then upon the completion of the probationary period, and absent a violation of the terms of the probation, the plea and probation shall not constitute a conviction for any purpose. Evidence of a plea of nolo contendere followed by a period of probation, completed without violation of the terms of the probation, may not be introduced in any court proceeding, except that records may be furnished to a sentencing court following the conviction of an individual for a crime committed subsequent to the successful completion of probation on the prior offense.

This section shall not apply to any person who is sentenced to serve a term in the adult correctional institutions or who is given a suspended or deferred sentence in addition to probation.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to persons making applications for the purchase of a firearm, or to persons making applications for permission to carry a concealable weapon, if the crime for which the plea was entered was a crime of violence as defined in §

11-47-2

or the plea was entered pursuant to chapter 28 of title 21. In these cases a plea of nolo contendere followed by probation shall be deemed a conviction for the purposes stated in this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 409, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 284, § 1.

12-18-4.
Repealed.